Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 33. Assisted Living Homes.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions, see §§ 16 and 17, ch. 130, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For assisted living homes, see 7 AAC 75.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on SB 249, from which ch. 130, SLA 1994, which enacted this chapter, derived, see 1994 Senate Journal 2505 — 2508.